Florida, session 2026, SB1538.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âParagraph (a) of subsection (3) of section 13 316.191, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 14 316.191âRacing on highways, street takeovers, and stunt 15 driving.â 16 (3)(a)âA Any person who violates subsection (2) commits a 17 misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 18 775.082 or s. 775.083, and must. Any person who violates 19 subsection (2) shall pay a fine of not less than $500 and not 20 more than $2,000, except that a person who in any manner 21 coordinates through social media or otherwise or who facilitates 22 a race, a drag race, a street takeover, stunt driving, a 23 competition, a contest, a test, or an exhibition in violation of 24 paragraph (2)(b) commits a felony of the third degree, 25 punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083, and must pay 26 a fine of not less than $2,500 and not more than $4,000. and The 27 department shall revoke the driver license of a person so 28 convicted for 1 year. A hearing may be requested pursuant to s. 29 322.271. 30 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect October 1, 2026.